Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB784.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Transfer of easement interest in lands in Overfield Township, Wyoming County.(a) Authorization.--In accordance with the requirements of section 20(b) of the act of June 22, 1964 (Sp.Sess. 1, P.L.131, No.8), known as the Project 70 Land Acquisition and Borrowing Act, the General Assembly authorizes the transfer of an easement interest in lands for a portion of the Project 70 lands owned by the Pennsylvania Fish and Boat Commission, known as Lake Winola Access, which are more particularly described under subsection (c), to the Department of Transportation.(b) Project 70 restrictions.--The title interests described under subsection (c) shall be transferred with none of the existing restrictions currently imposed by the Project 70 Land 1234567891011121314151617181920 Acquisition and Borrowing Act upon conveyance of the lands to the Department of Transportation. Mitigation for the loss of Project 70 lands shall consist of increased public access and safety.(c) Property description.--The interests in the parcels of land to be transferred with none of the existing Project 70 restrictions are located in Overfield Township, Wyoming County, and are as follows:Right of WayParcel 1AN EASEMENT UPON ALL THAT CERTAIN parcel of land located along the northwesterly line of the Legal Right of Way of State Route 2031 (Lake Road) and being further located as:COMMENCING from a point located at the centerline intersection of SR 2031 (Lake Road) and SR 0307 (Roosevelt Highway). Said POINT OF COMMENCEMENT being located at:Latitude North 41 degrees 30 minutes 27.59 seconds;Longitude West 75 degrees 50 minutes 32.98 seconds;thence from said POINT OF COMMENCEMENT, North 14 degrees 10 minutes 11 seconds East along the centerline of SR 2031 418.79 feet to a point of curvature; thence along the centerline of SR 2031 and along a curve to the right with a radius of 251.00 feet, an arc distance of 92.21 feet, a chord bearing of North 24 degrees 41 minutes 38 seconds East 91.69 feet to a point; thence leaving the centerline of SR 2031, North 54 degrees 46 minutes 56 seconds West, 20.00 feet to a point on the northwesterly line of the Legal Right of Way of State Route 2031 (Lake Road), the POINT OF BEGINNING of the Parcel 1 Required Highway Right of Way;thence from the POINT OF BEGINNING, along the northwestern 20250HB0784PN0805 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 right of way of SR 2031 (Lake Road) and along a curve to the left with a radius of 271.00 feet, an arc distance of 9.72 feet and a chord bearing of South 34 degrees 11 minutes 26 seconds West 9.72 feet to a point; thence leaving the northwestern right of way of SR 2031 (Lake Road) and through the property of the Pennsylvania Fish and Boat Commission the following three courses and distances:North 56 degrees 50 minutes 12 seconds West, 21.00 feet to a point;North 34 degrees 11 minutes 26 seconds East, 10.47 feet to a point;South 54 degrees 46 minutes 56 seconds East, 21.00 feet to a point, the POINT OF BEGINNING.Containing 211.64 square feet (0.0049 acres).Slope EasementParcel 2AN EASEMENT UPON ALL THAT CERTAIN parcel of land located along the northwesterly line of the Legal Right of Way of State Route 2031 (Lake Road) and being further located as:COMMENCING from a point located at the centerline intersection of SR 2031 (Lake Road) and SR 0307 (Roosevelt Highway). Said POINT OF COMMENCEMENT being located at:Latitude North 41 degrees 30 minutes 27.59 seconds;Longitude West 75 degrees 50 minutes 32.98 seconds;thence from said POINT OF COMMENCEMENT, North 14 degrees 10 minutes 11 seconds East along the centerline of SR 2031 418.79 feet to a point of curvature; thence along the centerline of SR 2031 and along a curve to the right with a radius of 251.00 feet, an arc distance of 92.21 feet, chord bearing of North 24 degrees 41 minutes 38 seconds East 91.69 feet to a point; thence 20250HB0784PN0805 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 leaving the centerline of SR 2031, North 54 degrees 46 minutes 56 seconds West 20.00 feet to a point on the northwesterly line of the Legal Right of Way of State Route 2031 (Lake Road), the POINT OF BEGINNING of the Parcel 2 Slope Easement;thence from the POINT OF BEGINNING, leaving the northwestern right of way of SR 2031 (Lake Road) and through the property of the Pennsylvania Fish and Boat Commission, the following nine courses and distances:North 54 degrees 46 minutes 56 seconds West 21.00 feet to a point;South 34 degrees 11 minutes 26 seconds West 3.49 feet to a point;North 51 degrees 19 minutes 28 seconds West 17.08 feet to a point;North 50 degrees 36 minutes 41 seconds West 16.05 feet to a point;North 38 degrees 21 minutes 11 seconds East 38.14 feet to a point;North 41 degrees 43 minutes 01 second East 60.53 feet to a point;South 48 degrees 16 minutes 59 seconds East 26.00 feet to a point;North 41 degrees 43 minutes 01 second East 18.00 feet to a point;South 46 degrees 14 minutes 15 seconds East 28.02 feet to a point located in the northwesterly line of the Legal Right of Way of State Route 2031 (Lake Road);thence along the northwesterly line of the Legal Right of Way of State Route 2031 (Lake Road), South 41 degrees 43 minutes 01 second West 77.53 feet to a point; thence along the same and 20250HB0784PN0805 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 along a curve to the left with a radius of 271.00 feet, an arc distance of 30.74 feet and a chord bearing of South 38 degrees 28 minutes 03 seconds West 30.72 feet to a point, the POINT OF BEGINNING.Containing 5,650.39 square feet (0.13 acres).Section 2. Effective date.This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB0784PN0805 - 5 - 1234567